Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.070

Rules—Time for compliance.

Any birthing center which is in operation at the time of promulgation of any applicable rules or regulations under this chapter shall be given a reasonable time, under the particular circumstances, not to exceed three months from the date of such promulgation, to comply with the rules and regulations established under this chapter.

[ 2000 c 93 s 34; 1951 c 168 s 8.]